Washington statutes.
RCW 39.36.040

Authorizations in violation of chapter void.

All orders, authorizations, allowances, contracts, payments or liabilities to pay, made or attempted to be made in violation of this chapter, shall be absolutely void and shall never be the foundation of a claim against a taxing district.

[ 1994 c 81 s 75; 1923 c 45 s 1; 1917 c 143 s 3; RRS s 5607.]